Florida, session 2026, HB899.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. (1) The Task Force on Artificial Intelligence
in Public Postsecondary Education, a task force as defined in s.
20.03(5), Florida Statutes, is created adjunct to the Department
of Education. The task force shall convene no later than August
1, 2026, to review and make recommendations on the
opportunities, risks, and best practices presented by artificial
intelligence in academic instruction, research, and student
conduct within the State University System and Florida College
System.
(2) The task force shall consist of the following members:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb899-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 899 2026
(a) Faculty members appointed by the presidents of state
universities and Florida College System institutions,
representing a mix of disciplines including humanities,
sciences, and professional programs.
(b) Representatives of the Board of Governors of the State
University System.
(c) Representatives of the State Board of Education.
(d) At least one expert in artificial intelligence,
computer science, or data ethics appointed by the Governor.
(e) One representative from the Southern Regional
Education Board.
(f) One representative from the Division of Colleges
within the Department of Education.
(g) One student representative, who must be the President
of the Florida student association or the equivalent who is
serving on the Board of Governors of the State University
System.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Examine the impact of artificial intelligence on
academic integrity, including plagiarism, contract cheating, and
the verification of student work.
(b) Review potential applications of artificial
intelligence in teaching, learning support, advising, grading,
accessibility, and research.
(c) Assess implications for privacy, intellectual
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb899-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 899 2026
property, and data security when artificial intelligence tools
are used by faculty and students.
(d) Consider safeguards to protect academic freedom while
maintaining clear expectations for student conduct.
(e) Identify professional development, resources, and
training needs for faculty and staff to address the responsible
use of artificial intelligence in the classroom.
(f) Review national and international best practices in
higher education regarding artificial intelligence governance
and adoption.
(g) Recommend model policies for institutions to adopt
regarding the ethical and effective use of artificial
intelligence.
(h) Solicit input from faculty senates, student
governments, accrediting bodies, and industry representatives
with expertise in artificial intelligence and workforce
development.
(4) By December 1, 2026, the task force shall submit a
report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives with its findings and
recommendations, including model policies and any proposed
legislation. The task force shall terminate upon submission of
the report.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb899-00